Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2901
State civil offices; vacancy; how filled.

Every state civil office filled by appointment shall be vacant upon the happening of any one of the events listed in section 32-560 except as provided in section 32-561. The resignation of the incumbent of such a civil office may be made as provided in section 32-562. Vacancies in such a civil office shall be filled as provided in sections 32-567 and 32-574 and shall be subject to section 32-563.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 609;

Laws 2015, LB575, § 30.